ro-RO: Articole necesare pentru tiparul de croitorie: Aplicații/petice; Bandă de bie; Balene; Catarame/feronerie; Nasturi; Șnur/cordon; Elastic; Capse/ochiuri; Bandă cu scai (Velcro); Întăritură (interfacing); Material pentru căptușeală; Niciunul; Cordonet; Vatelină; Material reiat; Bureți de umeri; Capse; Umplutură/vatelină sintetică; Fermoar; Altele
de: Erforderliches Nähzubehör für das Schnittmuster: Applikationen/Aufnäher; Schrägband; Korsettstäbchen; Schnallen/Beschläge; Knöpfe; Kordelzug/Kordel; Gummiband; Ösen; Klettband; Einlage; Futterstoff; Keine; Paspelband; Quilt-Vlies; Bündchenware; Schulterpolster; Druckknöpfe; Füllmaterial/Füllwatte; Reißverschluss; Andere
zh-TW: 縫紉樣板所需配件: 貼花/補丁; 包邊條; 魚骨/膠骨; 扣環/五金配件; 鈕扣; 抽繩/繩索; 鬆緊帶; 金屬孔環/雞眼扣; 魔鬼氈 (黏扣帶); 襯布; 內裡布料; 無; 滾邊條; 鋪棉; 羅紋布; 墊肩; 按扣; 填充物/纖維棉; 拉鍊; 其他
zh-CN: 缝纫图纸所需辅料: 贴布/补丁; 包边条; 鱼骨; 插扣/五金件; 纽扣; 抽绳/绳索; 松紧带; 索环/鸡眼扣; 魔术贴 (Velcro); 衬布; 衬里布料; 无; 嵌绳; 绗缝絮棉; 罗纹; 垫肩; 按扣; 填充物/纤维棉; 拉链; 其他
fr: Fournitures nécessaires pour le patron de couture: Appliqués/écussons; Biais; Baleines; Boucles/quincaillerie; Boutons; Cordon de serrage/cordon; Élastique; Œillets; Bande auto-agrippante (Velcro); Entoilage; Tissu de doublure; Aucun; Passepoil; Molleton pour matelassage; Bord-côte; Épaulettes; Boutons-pression; Rembourrage/fibre de remplissage; Fermeture éclair; Autre
da: Påkrævede syartikler for symønster: Applikationer/lapper; Skråbånd; Stivere; Spænder/beslag; Knapper; Snøre/snor; Elastik; Kovser/sejlringe; Burrebånd (Velcro); Indlægsstof; Forstof; Ingen; Tittekant; Quiltvat; Ribkant; Skulderpuder; Trykknapper; Fyld/fiberfyld; Lynlås; Andet
sv: Nödvändiga tillbehör för sömnadsmönster: Applikation/lappar; Snedslå; Skrädderiskenor/korsettfjädrar; Spännen/beslag; Knappar; Dragsko/snöre; Resår; Öljetter; Kardborreband (Velcro); Mellanlägg; Fodertyg; Inga; Passpoal; Vadd (quilt); Mudd; Axelvaddar; Tryckknappar; Stoppning/fiberfyllning; Dragkedja; Övrigt
it: Accessori necessari per il cartamodello: Applicazioni/Toppe; Nastro sbieco; Stecche; Fibbie/Minuteria; Bottoni; Coulisse/Cordoncino; Elastico; Occhielli; Nastro a strappo (Velcro); Teletta di rinforzo; Fodera; Nessuno; Bordino; Imbottitura per trapunta; Costina; Spalline; Bottoni a pressione; Imbottitura/Fibra di riempimento; Cerniera; Altro
sl-SI: Zahtevani šivalni pripomočki za šivalni kroj: Aplikacije/našitki; Poševni trak; Oporni trakovi; Zaponke/kovinski dodatki; Gumbi; Vrvica za zavezovanje/vrvica; Elastika; Kovinska ušesca/obročki; Sprijemalni trak (ježek); Medvloga; Blago za podlogo; Brez; Obrezni trak (piping); Polnilo za prešite odeje; Patent; Ramenske blazinice; Pritiskači; Polnilo/sintetično polnilo; Zadrga; Drugo
cs: Požadované pojmy týkající se šicích vzorů: Nášivky/záplaty; Šikmý proužek; Kostice; Přezky/kování; Knoflíky; Stahovací šňůrka; Pruženka; Průchodky/očka; Suchý zip; Výztuha; Podšívková látka; Žádné; Paspule; Vatelín na quiltování; Žebrování; Ramenní vycpávky; Patentky; Výplň/duté vlákno; Zip; Jiné
hr-HR: Potrebne ideje o šivaćem kroju: Aplikacije/zakrpe; Kosa traka; Fišbajn; Kopče/okovi; Gumbi; Uzica/kabel; Elastična traka; Ušice; Čičak-traka (Velcro); Međupodstava; Tkanina za podstavu; Ništa; Obrubna traka; Vatelin; Rebrasti rub; Jastučići za ramena; Pritisni gumbi; Punjenje; Patentni zatvarač; Ostalo
nl: Naaipatroon benodigde fournituren: Applicaties/patches; Biaisband; Baleinen; Gespen/hardware; Knopen; Trekkoord/koord; Elastiek; Zeilringen/oogjes; Klittenband (Velcro); Tussenvoering; Voeringstof; Geen; Paspoil; Quiltvulling; Boordstof; Schoudervullingen; Drukknopen; Vulling/fiberfill; Rits; Overig
es: Nociones obligatorias sobre el patrón de costura: Aplicaciones/parches; Cinta al bies; Varillas; Hebillas/herrajes; Botones; Cordón de ajuste/cordón; Elástico; Ojales/ojetes; Cinta autoadherente (Velcro); Entretela; Tela de forro; Ninguno; Ribete; Guata para acolchado; Punto acanalado; Hombreras; Broches; Relleno/fibra de relleno; Cremallera; Otro
pt-PT: Materiais necessários para o molde de costura: Aplicações/remendos; Fita de viés; Barbas; Fivelas/ferragens; Botões; Cordão; Elástico; Ilhós; Fita aderente (Velcro); Entretela; Tecido de forro; Nenhum; Vivo; Enchimento para quilt; Canelado; Chumaços; Molas de pressão; Enchimento/fibra; Fecho de correr; Outro
el: Απαιτούνται πρόσθετα είδη πατρόν ραπτικής: Απλικέ/μπαλώματα; Ρέλι; Μπανέλες; Αγκράφες/μεταλλικά εξαρτήματα; Κουμπιά; Κορδόνι περίσφιξης/κορδόνι; Λάστιχο; Τρουκς/κρίκοι; Αυτοκόλλητη ταινία (Velcro); Ενίσχυση (καμβάς); Ύφασμα φόδρας; Κανένα; Φιλέτο/ρέλι με κορδόνι; Βάτα παπλώματος; Λάστιχο (ριμπ); Βάτες; Κόπιτσες/σούστες; Υλικό γεμίσματος/αφρολέξ; Φερμουάρ; Άλλο
ko: 재봉 패턴에 필요한 재료: 아플리케/패치; 바이어스 테이프; 보닝; 버클/하드웨어; 버튼; 드로스트링/코드; 고무줄/밴드; 그로밋/아일릿; 훅 앤 루프 테이프(벨크로); 심지; 안감; 없음; 파이핑; 퀼트 솜; 시보리; 어깨 패드; 스냅; 충전재/파이버필; 지퍼; 기타
fi: Kaavaa varten tarvittavat ompelutarvikkeet: Applikointi/paikat; Vinonauha; Luunauha; Soljet/metalliosat; Napit; Nyöri/naru; Kuminauha; Purjerenkaat/sirkkarenkaat; Tarranauha (Velcro); Tukikangas; Vuorikangas; Ei mitään; Tere; Pehmustevanu; Resori; Olkatoppaukset; Nepparit; Täyte/vanu; Vetoketju; Muu
ja: 縫製パターンに必要な副資材: アップリケ/パッチ; バイアステープ; ボーン; バックル/金具; ボタン; ドローストリング/コード; ゴム; ハトメ/アイレット; 面ファスナー (ベルクロ); 芯地; 裏地; なし; パイピング; キルト芯; リブ; 肩パッド; スナップ; 詰め物/ファイバーフィル; ファスナー; その他
tr: Dikiş kalıbı için gerekli ek malzemeler: Aplike/yamalar; Biye bandı; Balen; Tokalar/metal aksam; Düğmeler; Büzgü ipi/kordon; Lastik; Kuşgözü/kapsül; Cırt cırtlı bant (Velcro); Tela; Astar kumaşı; Yok; Fitil; Yorgan elyafı; Ribana; Vatka; Çıtçıtlar; Dolgu/elyaf dolgu; Fermuar; Diğer
en: Sewing pattern notions required: Appliqué/patches; Bias tape; Boning; Buckles/hardware; Buttons; Drawstring/cord; Elastic; Grommets/eyelets; Hook & loop tape (Velcro); Interfacing; Lining fabric; None; Piping; Quilt batting; Ribbing; Shoulder pads; Snaps; Stuffing/fiberfill; Zipper; Other
th: อุปกรณ์เย็บผ้าที่จำเป็น: งานปะผ้า/อาร์มรีดติด; ผ้ากุ๊น; โครงดันทรง; หัวเข็มขัด/ฮาร์ดแวร์; กระดุม; เชือกรูด/เชือก; ยางยืด; ตาไก่; เทปตีนตุ๊กแก (Velcro); ผ้ากาว/ผ้าเคมี; ผ้าซับใน; ไม่มี; เชือกกุ๊น; ใยบุผ้านวม; ผ้าบุ้ง; ฟองน้ำหนุนไหล่; กระดุมแป๊ก; วัสดุยัดไส้/ใยสังเคราะห์; ซิป; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Reikalingi siuvimo modelio priedai: Aplikacijos / lopai; Įstrižinė juostelė; Korsažo lankeliai; Sagtys / furnitūra; Sagos; Raišteliai / virvelės; Guma; Žiedeliai / akutės; Kibioji juosta („Velcro“); Paklijavimas / flizelinas; Pamušalo audinys; Nėra; Kantas / apvadas; Skiautinių kamšalas; Stulpelinis trikotažas; Pečių pagalvėlės; Spaudės; Kamšalas / sinteponas; Užtrauktukas; Kita
nb: Nødvendige sytilbehør for mønster: Applikasjoner/lapper; Skråbånd; Spiler; Spenner/beslag; Knapper; Snor; Strikk; Maljer; Borrelås (Velcro); Innleggsstoff; Fôrstoff; Ingen; Bisebånd; Quiltevatt; Ribb; Skulderputer; Trykknapper; Fyll/vatt; Glidelås; Annet
bg-BG: Необходими шивашки материали (аксесоари) за кройката: Апликации/кръпки; Бие (кант); Банели; Токи/обков; Копчета; Връзка/шнур; Ластик; Капси/отвори за връзки; Залепваща лента (велкро); Подлепващ материал; Плат за хастар; Нищо; Паспел; Вата за капитониране; Рипс за кантове; Подплънки за рамене; Тик-так копчета; Пълнеж/фибърфил; Цип; Друго
vi: Các vật dụng cần thiết cho mẫu may: Miếng đắp/miếng vá; Viền xéo; Nẹp định hình; Khóa gài/phụ kiện kim loại; Cúc áo; Dây rút/dây bện; Thun; Vòng đệm/lỗ xỏ dây; Băng gai dính (Velcro); Mếch/keo dựng; Vải lót; Không có; Dây viền; Bông chần; Bo gân; Đệm vai; Nút bấm; Bông nhồi; Khóa kéo; Khác
sk-SK: Potrebné krajčírske pomôcky pre šijací strih: Aplikácie/záplaty; Šikmý prúžok; Kostice; Spony/kovanie; Gombíky; Sťahovacia šnúrka/šnúra; Guma; Priechodky/očká; Suchý zips (Velcro); Výstuž (vlizelín); Podšívková látka; Žiadne; Paspulka; Výplň do prikrývok (vatelín); Rebrovaný úplet; Ramenné vypchávky; Cvočky; Výplň/duté vlákno; Zips; Iné
ru: Необходимая фурнитура для выкройки: Аппликации/нашивки; Косая бейка; Корсетные косточки/регилин; Пряжки/фурнитура; Пуговицы; Кулиска/шнур; Резинка; Люверсы; Лента-липучка (Velcro); Прокладочный материал; Подкладочная ткань; Нет; Кант; Наполнитель для квилтинга; Рибана; Подплечники; Кнопки; Наполнитель/холлофайбер; Молния; Другое
pl: Wymagane dodatki do wykroju krawieckiego: Aplikacje/łaty; Lamówka; Fiszbiny; Klamry/okucia; Guziki; Ściągacz/sznurek; Guma; Przelotki/oczka; Rzep; Wkład odzieżowy; Podszewka; Brak; Wypustka; Wypełnienie do pikowania; Ściągacz; Poduszki naramienne; Zatrzaski; Wypełnienie/kulka silikonowa; Zamek błyskawiczny; Inne
hu: Szükséges varrókellékek: Rátétek / Foltok; Ferdepánt; Merevítő; Csatok / Fémkellékek; Gombok; Húzózsinór / Zsinór; Gumiszalag; Ringlik / Fűzőlyukak; Tépőzár (Velcro); Közbélés; Bélésanyag; Nincs; Szegélyzsinór; Paplanbélés / Vatelin; Passzé; Válltömések; Patentok; Tömőanyag / Műszálgolyó; Cipzár; Egyéb
pt-BR: Molde de costura aviamentos necessários: Apliques/patches; Fita de viés; Barbatanas; Fivelas/ferragens; Botões; Cordão; Elástico; Ilhós; Fita de fecho de contato (Velcro); Entretela; Tecido de forro; Nenhum; Vivo; Manta acrílica; Ribana; Ombreiras; Botões de pressão; Enchimento/fibra siliconada; Zíper; Outros